Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that Washington technology solutions (WaTech) exists to serve as a strategic, centralized information technology partner for state agencies, enabling better service delivery to Washingtonians, achieving cost savings through shared services, and ensuring uniform information technology standards across government. It provides these services to enhance transparency, efficiency, and the overall effectiveness of government operations through the appropriate use of technology.(2)(a) Given that technological innovation and new uses of data can help Washingtonians solve societal problems and improve quality of life, the legislature intends to shape responsible public policies where innovation and protection of individual privacy coexist and provide for the confidentiality of identifying personal information.(b) The legislature further intends to strengthen and enhance the protection of the information submitted to Washington technology solutions to provide information technology services.Sec. 2. RCW 43.105.020 and 2024 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Agency" means Washington technology solutions.(2) "Board" means the technology services board.(3) "Cloud computing" has the same meaning as provided by the special publication 800-145 issued by the national institute of standards and technology of the United States department of commerce as of September 2011 or its successor publications.(4) "Customer agencies" means all entities that purchase or use information technology resources, telecommunications, or services from Washington technology solutions.(5) "Digital experience platform" includes the agency's online systems, applications, or websites through which people find, access, interact with, or manage government services.(6) "Director" means the state chief information officer, who is the director of Washington technology solutions.(((6)))(7) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing activity for translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates, communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution.(((7)))(8) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities used in information processing, including but not limited to computers, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the operation of such equipment.(((8)))(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text, voice, and video.(((9)))(10) "Information security" means the protection of communication and information resources from unauthorized access, use, disclosure, disruption, modification, or destruction in order to:(a) Prevent improper information modification or destruction;(b) Preserve authorized restrictions on information access and disclosure;(c) Ensure timely and reliable access to and use of information; and(d) Maintain the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of information.(((10)))(11) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all electronic technology systems and services, automated information handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications, requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, radio technologies, and all related interactions between people and machines.(((11)))(12) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a strategic management process documenting relationships between agency missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.(((12)))(13) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW 43.41.391.(((13)))(14) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi-municipal corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.(((14)))(15) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology resources and telecommunications.(((15)))(16) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or license.(((16)))(17) "Public agency" means any agency of this state or another state; any political subdivision or unit of local government of this state or another state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service districts; any public benefit nonprofit corporation; any agency of the United States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government.(((17)))(18) "Public benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03A.245 that is receiving local, state, or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state.(((18)))(19) "Public record" has the definitions in RCW 42.56.010 and chapter 40.14 RCW and includes legislative records and court records that are available for public inspection.(((19)))(20) "Public safety" refers to any entity or services that ensure the welfare and protection of the public.(((20)))(21) "Ransomware" means a type of malware that attempts to deny a user or organization access to data or systems, usually through encryption, until a sum of money or other currency is paid or the user or organization is forced to take a specific action.(((21)))(22) "Security incident" means an accidental or deliberative event that results in or constitutes an imminent threat of the unauthorized access, loss, disclosure, modification, disruption, or destruction of communication and information resources.(((22)))(23) "State agency" means every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency, including offices headed by a statewide elected official.(((23)))(24) "Telecommunications" includes, but is not limited to, wireless or wired systems for transport of voice, video, and data communications, network systems, requisite facilities, equipment, system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all related interactions between people and machines.(((24)))(25) "Utility-based infrastructure services" includes personal computer and portable device support, servers and server administration, security administration, network administration, telephony, email, and other information technology services commonly used by state agencies.Sec. 3. RCW 43.105.365 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:(1) State agencies and local governments that collect and enter information concerning individuals into electronic records and information systems that will be widely accessible by the public under RCW 42.56.010 shall ensure the accuracy of this information to the extent possible. To the extent possible, information must be collected directly from, and with the consent of, the individual who is the subject of the data. State agencies shall establish procedures for correcting inaccurate information, including establishing mechanisms for individuals to review information about themselves and recommend changes in information they believe to be inaccurate. The inclusion of personal information in electronic public records that is widely available to the public should include information on the date when the database was created or most recently updated. If personally identifiable information is included in electronic public records that are made widely available to the public, state agencies must follow retention and archival schedules in accordance with chapter 40.14 RCW, retaining personally identifiable information only as long as needed to carry out the purpose for which it was collected. At least once every five years, each agency that collects information must review the information collected and justify why it is being collected and for what purpose.(2) Information submitted to the agency for the purpose of providing information technology related to digital experience platform services is exempt from public disclosure and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.Sec. 4. RCW 42.56.230 and 2023 c 361 s 14, 2023 c 346 s 1, and 2023 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The following personal information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare recipients;(2)(a) Personal information:(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files maintained by the department of children, youth, and families;(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs;(iii) For a student enrolled or previously enrolled in a local education agency, in any records pertaining to the student, including correspondence;(iv) For the family members or guardians of a child who is subject to the exemption under this subsection (2) if the family member or guardian has the same last name as the child or if the family member or guardian resides at the same address as the child and disclosure of the family member's or guardian's information would result in disclosure of the personal information exempted under (a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection; or(v) For substitute caregivers who are licensed or approved to provide overnight care of children by the department of children, youth, and families.(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by other law;(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093;(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address, social security number, or other personal information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an applicant declined to register with the selective service system.(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work, public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW 46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.Upon request by the legislature, the department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature containing all of the information in (c) of this subsection (7) and this subsection (7)(d) that is subject to public disclosure;(8) All information related to individual claim resolution settlement agreements submitted to the board of industrial insurance appeals under RCW 51.04.063, other than final orders from the board of industrial insurance appeals. The board of industrial insurance appeals shall provide to the department of labor and industries copies of all final claim resolution settlement agreements;(9) Voluntarily submitted information contained in a database that is part of or associated with 911 emergency communications systems, or information contained or used in emergency notification systems as provided under RCW 38.52.575 and 38.52.577;(10) Information relating to a future voter, as provided in RCW 29A.08.725;(11) All information submitted by a person to the state, either directly or through a state-licensed gambling establishment, or Indian tribes, or tribal enterprises that own gambling operations or facilities with class III gaming compacts, as part of the self-exclusion program established in RCW 9.46.071 or 67.70.040 for people with a gambling problem or gambling disorder;(12) Names, addresses, or other personal information of individuals who participated in the bump-fire stock buy-back program under former RCW 43.43.920; ((and))(13) All personal and financial information concerning a player that is received or maintained by the state lottery or any contracted lottery vendor except the player's name and city or town of residence. Additional information may be released only in accordance with prior written permission from the player; and(14) Information submitted to Washington technology solutions, as provided in RCW 43.105.365(2).--- END ---